North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Article 10. Assistance for Defaulting Units in Refinancing Debt.

§ 159-176.
Commission to aid defaulting units in developing refinancing plans.

If a unit of local government or municipality (as defined in

G.S. 159-44

, 159-81, or 159-102) fails to pay any installment of principal or interest on its outstanding debt on or before the due date (whether the debt is evidenced by general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, project development financing debt instruments, bond anticipation notes, tax anticipation notes, or revenue anticipation notes) and remains in default for 90 days, the Commission may take such action as it deems advisable to investigate the unit’s or municipality’s fiscal affairs, consult with its governing board, and negotiate with its creditors in order to assist the unit or municipality in working out a plan for refinancing, adjusting, or compromising the debt. When a plan is developed that the Commission finds to be fair and equitable and reasonably within the ability of the unit or municipality to meet, the Commission shall enter an order finding that it is fair, equitable, and within the ability of the unit or municipality to meet. The Commission shall then advise the governing board to take the necessary steps to implement it. If the governing board declines or refuses to do so within 90 days after receiving the Commission’s advice, the Commission may enter an order directing the governing board to implement the plan. When this order is entered, the members of the governing board and all officers and employees of the unit or municipality shall be under an affirmative duty to do all things necessary to implement the plan. The Commission may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for a court order to the governing board and other officers and employees of the unit or municipality to enforce the Commission’s order.

History.

1935, c. 124, ss. 1, 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 41; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1276, s. 12; 2003-403, s. 15.

Cross References.

For statute authorizing local units of the State to avail themselves of the Federal Bankruptcy Act, see

G.S. 23-48

.

§ 159-177.
Power to require reports and approve budgets.

When a refinancing plan has been put into effect pursuant to

G.S. 159-176

, the Commission shall have authority to require any periodic reports on the unit’s or municipality’s financial affairs (in addition to those otherwise required by law) that the secretary deems necessary, and to approve or reject the unit’s or municipality’s annual budget ordinance. The governing board of the unit or municipality shall obtain the approval of the secretary before adopting the annual budget ordinance. If the Commission recommends modifications in the budget, the governing board shall be under an affirmative duty to make the modifications before adopting the budget ordinance.

History.

1935, c. 124, ss. 3, 4; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, ss. 41, 42.

§ 159-178.
Duration of Commission’s powers.

The power and authority granted to the Commission in this Article shall continue with respect to a defaulting unit of local government or municipality until the Commission is satisfied that the unit or municipality has performed or will perform the duties required of it in the refinancing plan, and until agreements made with the unit’s or municipality’s creditors have been performed in accordance with the plan.

History.

1935, c. 124, s. 5; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 41; 1975, c. 19, s. 62.

§§ 159-179,
159-180.

Reserved for future codification purposes.